North Dakota statutes. TITLE 59 Trusts
CHAPTER 59-02 Trusts for the Benefit of Third Persons [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27]

59-02-01.
Application of chapter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-02.
Mutual consent of trustor and trustee necessary. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-03.
When court trustor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-04.
Declaration of nature of trust. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-05.
Trustee shall obey declaration of trust. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-05.1.
Investment of trust funds in mutual funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-06.
Ordinary care by trustee required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 82.

59-02-07.
Appointment of successor to trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-08.
Investment of trust funds — Prudent investor rule. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 508, § 3.

59-02-08.1.
Prudent investor rule. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-08.2.
Standard of care — Portfolio strategy — Risk and return objectives. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-08.3.
Diversification. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-08.4.
Duties at inception of trusteeship. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-08.5.
Loyalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-08.6.
Impartiality. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-08.7.
Investment costs. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-08.8.
Reviewing compliance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-08.9.
Delegation of investment and management functions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-08.10.
Language invoking standard of sections 59-02-08.1 through 59-02-08.11. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-08.11.
Application to existing trusts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-09.
Claims purchased by trustee not enforceable. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-10.
Authority of trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-11.
All cotrustees must act in unity. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-12.
Discretionary power of trustee — How exercised. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-13.
Instruments executed by trustee in representative capacity — Effect. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-14.
Trustee’s expenses paid out of trust estate. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-15.
Compensation of trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-16.
No compensation to implied trustees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-17.
Trusts — How terminated. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-17.1.
Suspension of power of alienation — Rule against perpetuities — Exception. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-18.
Trust not revocable — Exception. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-19.
Office of trustee — How vacated. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-20.
Discharge of trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-21.
Trust survives to cotrustees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-02-22.
Private foundations — Charitable trusts — Split-interest trusts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.